California, session 20252026, SB941.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Chapter 24.6 (commencing with Section 22756) is added to Division 8 of the Business and Professions Code, to read: CHAPTER 24.6. Private Detention Facilities22756. (a) For the purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings: (1) “Commissary” means any onsite or online store, canteen, vendor-operated program, or retail service that sells goods, food, hygiene supplies, phone cards, or other items to people confined in a private detention facility, whether operated directly by the facility or through a third-party contractor.(2) “Private detention facility” has the same meaning as defined in Section 9500 of the Penal Code.(b) The sale price of an article offered for sale in a commissary at a private detention facility shall not exceed a 35-percent markup above the amount paid to a vendor for that article.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Lines 2, 4, and 6.___________________